src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
!! !!! Livonian noun inflection
! ---------------


!! !!PROBLEMS with dictionary lexica

LEXICON N_  !!≈ * __@CODE@__ 
+TYÄ: # ;
LEXICON N_¤51  !!≈ * __@CODE@__   
+TYÄ: # ;
LEXICON N_37  !!≈ * __@CODE@__ 
+TYÄ: # ;
LEXICON N_¤29  !!≈ * __@CODE@__ 
+TYÄ: # ;

!! !! Stem lexica
LEXICON N_PŪ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ contains pū: 12
!! ~156
+N:	NMN_PŪ ;

LEXICON N_PŪ-PL !!≈ * __@CODE@__ contains pū: 12
+N:	NMN_PŪ-PL   ;

LEXICON N_RǬʼ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ contains rǭʼ:rǭʼ 13
+N:	NMN_RǬʼ	;

LEXICON N_PǞ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ contains pǟ:pǟ 14
+N:	NMN_PǞ	;

LEXICON N_TĪE !!≈ * __@CODE@__ contains tīe:tīe 15
+N:	NMN_TĪE	;
	
LEXICON N_TĪE-PL !!≈ * __@CODE@__ contains tīe:tīe 15
+N:     NMN_TĪE-PL   ;

LEXICON N_BRĪ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ contains brī:brī 16
+N:	NMN_BRĪ	  ;
	
LEXICON N_TEI !!≈ * __@CODE@__ contains tei:tei 17
+N:	NMN_TEI	;

LEXICON N_KUŖĒ  !!≈ * __@CODE@__ contains  kuŗē:kuʼŗŗē 18
+N:     NMN_KUŖĒ   ;

LEXICON N_KUŖĒ-SG  !!≈ * __@CODE@__ contains  kuŗē:kuʼŗŗē 18
+N:     NMN_KUŖĒ-SG    ;

LEXICON N_KUŖĒ-PL  !!≈ * __@CODE@__ contains  kuŗē:kuʼŗŗē 18
+N:     NMN_KUŖĒ-PL    ;


LEXICON N_KALĀ  !!≈ * __@CODE@__ contains  kalā:kaʼlā 18
+N:	NMN_KALĀ   ;

LEXICON N_KALĀ-SG  !!≈ * __@CODE@__ contains  kalā:kaʼlā 18
+N:	NMN_KALĀ-SG    ;

LEXICON N_KALĀ-PL  !!≈ * __@CODE@__ contains  kalā:kaʼlā 18
+N:	NMN_KALĀ-PL    ;

LEXICON N_TUBĀ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ tubā:tuʼbā 19
 	N_TUBĀ-SG	;
 	N_TUBĀ-PL	;

LEXICON N_TUBĀ-SG !!≈ * __@CODE@__ tubā:tuʼbā 19
+N:	NMN_TUBĀ-SG   ;

LEXICON N_TUBĀ-PL !!≈ * __@CODE@__ tubā:tuʼbā 19
+N:	NMN_TUBĀ-PL   ;

LEXICON N_AIGĀ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ aigā:aigā 20
+N:	NMN_AIGĀ	;

LEXICON N_LĒBA !!≈ * __@CODE@__ lēba:leiba 21
+N:	NMN_LĒBA	;

LEXICON N_KŪJA !!≈ * __@CODE@__ kūja:lēba 21
+N:	NMN_KŪJA	;

LEXICON N_PŪOGA !!≈ * __@CODE@__ pūoga:pūoga 22
+N:	NMN_PŪOGA	;

LEXICON N_LǬJA !!≈ * __@CODE@__ lǭja:lǭja 23
	N_LǬJA-SG	;
	N_LǬJA-PL	;

LEXICON N_LǬJA-SG !!≈ * __@CODE@__ lǭja:lǭja 23
+N:     NMN_LǬJA-SG   ;

LEXICON N_LǬJA-PL !!≈ * __@CODE@__ lǭja:lǭja 23
+N:     NMN_LǬJA-PL   ;

LEXICON N_PǞVA !!≈ * __@CODE@__ pǟva:pǟva 24
+N:	NMN_PǞVA	;

LEXICON N_PǞVA-PL !!≈ * __@CODE@__ pǟva:pǟva 24
+N:     NMN_PǞVA-PL   ;

LEXICON N_IZĀ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ izā:izā 25
+N:	NMN_IZĀ	;

LEXICON N_PIEZĀ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ piezā:pieʼzzā 25
+N:	NMN_PIEZĀ	;

LEXICON N_AŽĀ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ ažā:aʼžā 26
	N_AŽĀ-SG	;
	N_AŽĀ-PL	;

LEXICON N_AŽĀ-SG !!≈ * __@CODE@__ ažā:aʼžā 26
+N:     NMN_AŽĀ-SG   ;
LEXICON N_AŽĀ-PL !!≈ * __@CODE@__ ažā:aʼžā 26
+N:     NMN_AŽĀ-PL   ;

LEXICON N_ĀĻDŽA !!≈ * __@CODE@__ āļdža:āļdža 27
	N_ĀĻDŽA-SG       ;
        N_ĀĻDŽA-PL       ;

LEXICON N_ĀĻDŽA-SG !!≈ * __@CODE@__ āļdža:āļdža 27
+N:     NMN_ĀĻDŽA-SG   ;

LEXICON N_ĀĻDŽA-PL !!≈ * __@CODE@__ āļdža:āļdža 27
+N:     NMN_ĀĻDŽA-PL   ;

LEXICON N_SUKĀ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ sukā:sukā 28
+N:	NMN_SUKĀ	;

LEXICON N_LIEPĀ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ liepā:liepā 29
+N:	NMN_LIEPĀ	;

LEXICON N_OKSĀ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ oksā:oksā 30
+N:	NMN_OKSĀ	;

LEXICON N_VȰNTSA !!≈ * __@CODE@__ vȱntsa:vȱntsa 31
+N:	NMN_VȰNTSA	;

LEXICON N_LIESTĀ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ liestā:liestā 32
+N:	NMN_LIESTĀ	;

LEXICON N_ĀIGA !!≈ * __@CODE@__ āiga:āiga 33
+N:	NMN_ĀIGA	;

LEXICON N_LĀNGA !!≈ * __@CODE@__ lānga:lānga 33
+N:	NMN_LĀNGA	;

LEXICON N_SĪLMA !!≈ * __@CODE@__ sīlma:sīlma 34
	N_SĪLMA-SG ;
	N_SĪLMA-PL ;

LEXICON N_SĪLMA-SG
+N:	NMN_SĪLMA-SG	;

LEXICON N_SĪLMA-PL !!≈ * __@CODE@__ sīlma:sīlma 34
+N:     NMN_SĪLMA-PL   ;

LEXICON N_KǞNGA !!≈ * __@CODE@__ kǟnga:kǟnga 35
+N:	NMN_KǞNGA	;

LEXICON N_ĀINA !!≈ * __@CODE@__ āina:āina 36
	N_ĀINA-SG	;
	N_ĀINA-PL	;

LEXICON N_ĀINA-SG !!≈ * __@CODE@__ āina:āina 36
+N:     NMN_ĀINA-SG   ;

LEXICON N_ĀINA-PL !!≈ * __@CODE@__ āina:āina 36
+N:     NMN_ĀINA-PL   ;

LEXICON N_VĒNA !!≈ * __@CODE@__ vēna:vēna 37
+N:	NMN_VĒNA	;

LEXICON N_RŌDA !!≈ * __@CODE@__ rōda:rōda 38
+N:	NMN_RŌDA	;

LEXICON N_RŌDA-PL !!≈ * __@CODE@__ rōda:rōda 38
+N:     NMN_RŌDA-PL   ;

LEXICON N_PADĀ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ padā:padā 39
+N:	NMN_PADĀ   ;

LEXICON N_PADĀ-SG !!≈ * __@CODE@__ padā:padā 39
+N:	NMN_PADĀ-SG   ;

LEXICON N_PADĀ-PL !!≈ * __@CODE@__ padā:padā 39
+N:	NMN_PADĀ-PL   ;

LEXICON N_SÕBRĀ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ sõbrā:sõbrā 40
	N_SÕBRĀ-SG	;
	N_SÕBRĀ-PL	;

LEXICON N_SÕBRĀ-SG !!≈ * __@CODE@__ sõbrā:sõbrā 40
+N:	NMN_SÕBRĀ-SG  ;

LEXICON N_SÕBRĀ-PL !!≈ * __@CODE@__ sõbrā:sõbrā 40
+N:	NMN_SÕBRĀ-PL  ;

LEXICON N_KÄPĀ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ käpā:käpā 41
     N_KÄPĀ-SG  ;
     N_KÄPĀ-PL  ;

LEXICON N_KÄPĀ-SG !!≈ * __@CODE@__ käpā:käpā 41
+N:     NMN_KÄPĀ-SG  ;

LEXICON N_KÄPĀ-PL !!≈ * __@CODE@__ käpā:käpā 41
+N:     NMN_KÄPĀ-PL  ;

LEXICON N_MAKSĀ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ maksā:maksā 42
+N:     NMN_PADĀ  ;
LEXICON N_MAKSĀ-PL !!≈ * __@CODE@__ maksā:maksā 42
+N:     NMN_PADĀ-PL  ;

LEXICON N_KĒRA !!≈ * __@CODE@__ kēra:kēra 43
+N:	NMN_KĒRA	;

LEXICON N_JǬRA !!≈ * __@CODE@__ jǭra:jǭra 44
+N:	NMN_JǬRA	;
LEXICON N_JǬRA-PL !!≈ * __@CODE@__ jǭra:jǭra 44
+N:	NMN_JǬRA-PL	;

LEXICON N_PŪOLA !!≈ * __@CODE@__ pūola:pūola 45
+N:	NMN_PŪOLA	;

LEXICON N_ĀITA !!≈ * __@CODE@__ āita:āita 46
+N:	NMN_ĀITA	;

LEXICON N_ĀITA-PL !!≈ * __@CODE@__ āita:āita 46
+N:     NMN_ĀITA-PL   ;

LEXICON N_ŪŠKA !!≈ * __@CODE@__ ūška:ūška 47
+N:	NMN_ŪŠKA	;

LEXICON N_MȬKA !!≈ * __@CODE@__ mȭka:mȭka 48
+N:	NMN_MȬKA	;

LEXICON N_DADŽĀ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ dadžā:daʼdžā 49
	N_DADŽĀ-SG	;
	N_DADŽĀ-PL	;
LEXICON N_DADŽĀ-SG !!≈ * __@CODE@__ dadžā:daʼdžā 49
+N:	NMN_DADŽĀ-SG	;
LEXICON N_DADŽĀ-PL !!≈ * __@CODE@__ dadžā:daʼdžā 49
+N:	NMN_DADŽĀ-PL	;

LEXICON N_SUŠĀ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ sušā:sušā 50
+N:	NMN_SUŠĀ	;

LEXICON N_KUPŠĀ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ kupšā:kupšā 51
+N:	NMN_KUPŠĀ	;

LEXICON N_TŠŪRTŠA !!≈ * __@CODE@__ tšūrtša:tšūrtša 52
+N:	NMN_TŠŪRTŠA	;

LEXICON N_SĒMḐA !!≈ * __@CODE@__ sēmḑa:sēmḑa 53
+N:	NMN_SĒMḐA	;

LEXICON N_TĪERA !!≈ * __@CODE@__ tīera:tīera 54
 N_TĪERA-SG ;
 N_TĪERA-PL ;
LEXICON N_TĪERA-SG
+N:	NMN_TĪERA-SG	;
LEXICON N_TĪERA-PL
+N:	NMN_TĪERA-PL	;

LEXICON N_KRǬIPA !!≈ * __@CODE@__ krǭipa:krǭipa 55
+N:	NMN_KRǬIPA	;

LEXICON N_LILLA !!≈ * __@CODE@__ kuțā:kuțā 57
+N:	NMN_LILLA	;

LEXICON N_KUȚĀ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ kuțā:kuțā 57
+N:	NMN_KUȚĀ	;

LEXICON N_NĒTŠA !!≈ * __@CODE@__ nētša:nētša 58
+N:	NMN_NĒTŠA	;

LEXICON N_KIʼV !!≈ * __@CODE@__ kiʼv:kiv 59
	N_KIʼV-SG  ;
	N_KIʼV-PL  ;
LEXICON N_KIʼV-SG
+N:	NMN_KIʼV-SG	;
LEXICON N_KIʼV-PL
+N:	NMN_KIʼV-PL	;

LEXICON N_KUOʼIG !!≈ * __@CODE@__ kuoʼig:kuoʼig 60
+N:	NMN_KUOʼIG	;

LEXICON N_KEP !!≈ * __@CODE@__ kep:kep aʼb 61
        N_KEP-SG   ;
        N_KEP-PL   ;
LEXICON N_KEP-SG !!≈ * __@CODE@__ kep:kep aʼb 61
+N:     NMN_KEP-SG   ;
LEXICON N_KEP-PL !!≈ * __@CODE@__ kep:kep aʼb 61
+N:     NMN_KEP-PL   ;

LEXICON N_KRUȚK !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 62
+N:	NMN_KRUȚK	;

LEXICON N_KRÄMP !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 63
+N:	NMN_KRÄMP	;

LEXICON N_PIʼŅ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ piʼņ:piņ 64
	N_PIʼŅ-SG	;
	N_PIʼŅ-PL	;
LEXICON N_PIʼŅ-SG !!≈ * __@CODE@__ piʼņ:piņ 64
+N:     NMN_PIʼŅ-SG   ;
LEXICON N_PIʼŅ-PL !!≈ * __@CODE@__ piʼņ:piņ 64
+N:     NMN_PIʼŅ-PL   ;

LEXICON N_KUOȚ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 65
+N:	NMN_KUOȚ	;
LEXICON N_KUOȚ-PL !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 65
+N:     NMN_KUOȚ-PL   ;

LEXICON N_VAKȚ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 66
+N:	NMN_VAKȚ	;

LEXICON N_REŅ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 67
+N:	NMN_REŅ	;

LEXICON N_OKŠ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 68
+N:	NMN_OKŠ	;

LEXICON N_KAŠ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 69
+N:	NMN_KAŠ	;

LEXICON N_DUŅTŠ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 70
+N:	NMN_DUŅTŠ	;

LEXICON N_TORĪ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 71
+N:	NMN_TORĪ	;

LEXICON N_VAʼG !!≈ * __@CODE@__ vaʼg:vag 72
+N:	NMN_VAʼG	;
LEXICON N_VAʼG-PL !!≈ * __@CODE@__ vaʼg:vag 72
+N:     NMN_VAʼG-PL   ;

LEXICON N_KÕʼL !!≈ * __@CODE@__ kõʼl:kõl 73
+N:	NMN_KÕʼL	;

LEXICON N_SUʼG !!≈ * __@CODE@__ suʼg:sug 74
+N:	NMN_SUʼG	;

LEXICON N_JOʼUG !!≈ * __@CODE@__ joʼug:joug 75
+N:	NMN_JOʼUG	;

LEXICON N_NIʼM !!≈ * __@CODE@__ niʼm:nim 76
+N:	NMN_NIʼM	;
LEXICON N_NIʼM-PL !!≈ * __@CODE@__ niʼm:nim 76
+N:     NMN_NIʼM-PL   ;

LEXICON N_USK !!≈ * __@CODE@__ usk: 77
+N:	NMN_USK	;

LEXICON N_VAŠK !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 78
+N:	NMN_VAŠK	;

LEXICON N_TUP !!≈ * __@CODE@__ tup:tup 79
	N_TUP-SG	;
	N_TUP-PL	;
LEXICON N_TUP-SG !!≈ * __@CODE@__ tup:tup 79
+N:     NMN_TUP-SG   ;
LEXICON N_TUP-PL !!≈ * __@CODE@__ tup:tup 79
+N:     NMN_TUP-PL   ;
