src/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON nouns
konkš:konkš N_DUŅTŠ  "nuija" ;
koʼl:koʼl N_KÕʼL  "kammio" ;
krämp:krämp N_KRÄMP  "kouristus" ;
kuoʼdtīe:kuoʼd#tīʼe N_TĪE  "kotitehtävä" ;
kupšā:kupšā N_KUPŠĀ  "ostelija" ;
kuŗē:kuʼŗ N_KUŖĒ  "paholainen" ;
kuțā:kuțā N_KUȚĀ  "hauva" ;
kēja:keija N_LĒBA  "tahko" ;
kūja:kūja N_KŪJA  "kuivuus" ;
lakād:lakā N_KÄPĀ-PL  "harja" ;
liepā:liep N_LIEPĀ  "leppä" ;
lānga:lānga N_LĀNGA  "lanka" ;
lōka:louka N_RŌDA  "laukka" ;
lūodpūd:lūodõ#pū N_PŪ-PL  "luomapuut" ;
lūvalūd:lū#vaʼl N_NIʼM-PL  "luusärky" ;
lǟlamjālgad:lǟlam#jālgad N_SĪLMA-PL  "raskaus" ;
mai:mai N_BRĪ  "toukokuu" ;
mandõlpū:mandõl#pū N_PŪ  "mantelipuu" ;
mask:mask N_USK  "naamio" ;
midžā:miʼdžā N_DADŽĀ  "karhunkuoppa" ;
munā:muʼn N_KALĀ  "muna" ;
munād:muʼnā N_KALĀ-PL  "kivekset" ;
mäʼgnaigā:mäʼgn#aʼig N_AIGĀ  "mäenrinne" ;
mõtsātīed:mõtsā#tīʼe N_TĪE-PL  "metsänhakkuu" ;
mǟrga:mǟrga N_KǞNGA  "mätä" ;
mǭrjei:mǭr#jei N_BRĪ  "aluna" ;
naț:naț N_KUOȚ  "merenneito" ;
nǭra:nǭra N_JǬRA  "merenneito" ;
oksā:oksā N_OKSĀ  "oksa" ;
oʼvriestā:oʼv#riestā N_LIESTĀ  "havupuun oksa" ;
papīerkrežā:papīer#kreʼžžā N_AŽĀ  "paperikori" ;
papīerrǭʼ:papīer#rǭʼ N_RǬʼ  "paperiraha" ;
paskā:paskā N_MAKSĀ  "paska" ;
paʼldõbrejā:paʼldõb#reʼj N_TUBĀ  "YY" ;
pierzjālga:pierz#jālga N_SĪLMA  "lapasotka" ;
pivād:piʼvā N_TUBĀ-PL  "iltama" ;
pițkīzpǟ:pițkīz#pǟ N_PǞ  "ukkospilvi" ;
poḑīd:poʼḑ N_PIʼŅ-PL  "roju" ;
punā:puʼnā N_KALĀ-SG  "puna" ;
pōtša:pōtša N_NĒTŠA  "poju" ;
pūola:pūola N_PŪOLA  "polvi" ;
pūtīe:pū#tīʼe N_TĪE  "puutyö" ;
pūʼojnabā:pūʼoj#nabā N_PADĀ-SG  "pohjoisnapa" ;
pǭžkiʼv:pǭž#kiʼv N_KIʼV  "dolomiitti" ;
rabā:raʼb N_PADĀ  "oluen mäski" ;
rabād:rabā N_PADĀ-PL  "mäski" ;
reņ:reņ N_REŅ  "ränni" ;
rieklēba:riek#leib N_LĒBA  "eväs" ;
rištizā:rišt#iʼz N_IZĀ  "kummisetä" ;
rištlūd:rišt#lū N_PŪ-PL  "ristiselkä" ;
roʼvrõkūd:roʼv#rõk N_TUP-PL  "huhu" ;
rōdad:rōda N_RŌDA-PL  "kahleet" ;
rǟnka:rǟnka N_ĀITA  "karukko" ;
sidāmsõbrā:sidām#sõʼbrā N_SÕBRĀ  "sydänystävä" ;
sigāsēmḑa:sigā#sēmḑa N_SĒMḐA  "voikukka" ;
speksǭja:spek#sǭija N_LǬJA  "silavapiirakka" ;
streppūlkad:strep#pūlka N_ĀITA-PL  "askelmat" ;
strepīd:strep N_KEP-PL  "portaat" ;
suʼg:suʼg N_SUʼG  "sukulainen" ;
sõʼvpivād:sõʼv#piʼvā N_TUBĀ-PL  "helluntai" ;
sīezõrāina:sīezõr#āina N_ĀINA  "ukontatar" ;
sūrsušā:sūr#sušā N_SUŠĀ  "täti" ;
sǟrsukā:sǟr#sukkā N_SUKĀ  "YY" ;
tei:tei N_TEI  "täi" ;
tomātõdpuʼļ:tomātõd#puʼļ N_PIʼŅ  "liemi" ;
tosāpīla:tosā#pīla N_KĒRA  "sumupilvi" ;
toļpiezā:toļ#pieʼz N_PIEZĀ  "YY" ;
truš:truš N_KAŠ  "kaniini" ;
tsitronpū:tsitron#pū N_PŪ  "sitruuna" ;
tsop:tsop N_KEP  "palmikko" ;
tuʼlkuoʼig:tuʼl#kuoʼig N_KUOʼIG  "majakkalaiva" ;
tīemizsõnā:tīemiz#sõʼn N_KALĀ  "teonsana" ;
tīetiegūd:tīe#tieʼg N_VAʼG-PL  "työasiat" ;
tōka:tōuka N_MȬKA  "terttu" ;
ulzaʼjtõbāiga:ulz#aʼjtõb#āig N_ĀIGA  "YY" ;
ulzraʼbbõm:ulz#raʼbbõm N_¤29  "ryhelmä" ;
vaigā:vaʼig N_AIGĀ  "YY" ;
vanājoʼug:vanā#joʼug N_JOʼUG  "vanha joenuoma" ;
vațīd:vaț N_KUOȚ-PL  "topatakki" ;
vaʼnnizpǟvad:vaʼnniz#pǟuva N_PǞVA-PL  "vanhuuden päivät" ;
veispǟ:veis#pǟ N_PǞ  "veitsenpää" ;
vijānikā:vijānikā N_KÄPĀ  "vihollinen" ;
võʼlsõnād:võʼl#sõʼnā N_KALĀ-PL  "loitsu" ;
vāldavašk:vālda#vašk N_VAŠK  "messinki" ;
vēna:veina N_VĒNA  "jokisuun satama" ;
vībtõmrǭʼ:vībtõm#rǭʼ N_RǬʼ  "viivästyskorko" ;
vīrtša:vīrtša N_TŠŪRTŠA  "lantavesi" ;
vǭjad:vǭija N_LǬJA-PL  "synnytyskipu" ;
vȯjā:vȯʼj N_TUBĀ  "YY" ;
vȯrdāinad:vȯrd#āina N_ĀINA-PL  "matolääke" ;
vȱntsa:vȱntsa N_VȰNTSA  "otsa" ;
älviʼb:äl#viʼb N_VAʼG  "" ;
ändõstpǟva:ändõst#pǟuva N_PǞVA  "toissa päivä" ;
ānkaŗplatš:ānkaŗ#platš N_OKŠ  "ankkuripaikka" ;
āļdža:āļdža N_ĀĻDŽA  "aivastus" ;
ēdrõmnik:ēdrõm#nik N_TUP  "luotti" ;
īrpūoga:īr#pūog N_PŪOGA  "hiirenpoikanen" ;
špits:špits N_KRUȚK  "huippu" ;
ūomõgkaffe:ūomõg#kaffe N_LILLA  "aamukahvi" ;
ǭʼrõndtei:ǭʼrõnd#tei N_TEI  "vaatetäi" ;
ȭʼdõgvaʼl:ȭʼdõg#vaʼl N_NIʼM  "iltarusko" ;
mieʼrūška:mieʼr#ūška N_ŪŠKA  "merikäärme" ;
kolibrī:kolibrī N_TORĪ  "kolibri" ;
Saeima:Saeima N_KRǬIPA  "Latvian parlamentti" ;
uļļiztažād:uļļizt#aʼžžā N_AŽĀ-PL  "ulkoasiat" ;
īevakț:īe#vakț N_VAKȚ  "yövartija" ;
